Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-628.16
Extended benefits; payments not required; when.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, payment of extended benefits shall not be made to any individual for any week if (a) extended benefits would, but for this section, have been payable for such week pursuant to an interstate claim filed in any state under the interstate benefit payment plan, and (b) an extended benefit period is not in effect for such week in such state.

(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply with respect to the first two weeks for which extended benefits are payable, determined without regard to this section, pursuant to an interstate claim filed under the interstate benefit payment plan to the individual from the extended benefit account established for the benefit year.

Laws 1981, LB 470, § 6;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-628.04;

Laws 2017, LB172, § 46.